New York, session 2025-2026, A10120.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 2801-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 2801-c. Emergency mapping grant program. 1. Subject to appropri- 4 ation, the commissioner shall establish a competitive emergency mapping 5 grant program which shall provide grants to school districts or boards 6 of cooperative educational services to upgrade their floor plans, blue- 7 prints, schematics or other maps of their school interior, school 8 grounds and road maps of the immediate surrounding area included in 9 their building level emergency response plans as required by paragraph c 10 of subdivision three of section twenty-eight hundred one-a of this arti- 11 cle, and for other school safety related purposes as determined by the 12 commissioner. 13 2. Districts or boards of cooperative educational services which 14 receive funds shall ensure their maps are in a format compatible with 15 software platforms used by local, state, county, and federal law 16 enforcement agencies that provide emergency services to the specific 17 school for which the data is provided without requiring such law 18 enforcement agencies to purchase additional software or requiring the 19 integration of third-party software to view the data, and compatible 20 with security software platforms in use by the specific school for which 21 the data is provided without requiring such school and law enforcement 22 agencies to purchase additional software or requiring the integration of 23 third-party software to view the data. Such site maps shall be verified 24 for accuracy through an initial and annual walkthrough of all school 25 buildings and grounds. 26 3. In awarding such grants, the commissioner shall prioritize high 27 need districts. 28 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14509-01-6